New Jersey, session 221, A4305.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         A resident taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from gross income 50 percent of the amount paid by the taxpayer during the taxable year for costs related to in vitro fertilization (IVF) treatment for the taxpayer or the taxpayers spouse or domestic partner.  To be eligible for this deduction, the amounts paid shall not be: (1)  covered by health insurance plans issued by hospital, medical, and health service corporations; commercial group insurers; health maintenance organizations; the State Health Benefits Program, or the School Employees Health Benefits Plan; and (2)  otherwise deductible from the taxpayers gross income pursuant to N.J.S.54A:3-3. b.    For the purposes of this section, in vitro fertilization means all medical and laboratory procedures that are required to effectuate the formation of a human embryo outside the human body. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.